Arkansas, session 2025, HB1741.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code §§ 2-19-304 through 2-19-307 are amended to
read as follows:
2-19-304. Sampling and analysis.
(a) The State Plant Board Department of Agriculture through its
authorized agents is authorized to select from any package, bulk load, or lot
of liming material exposed for sale or distribution in this state a quantity
not less than two pounds (2 lbs.) for a sample, to be used for the purpose of
an official analysis for comparison with the statement required by § 2-19-303
or the rules provided for therein.
(b) The board department and its authorized agents shall have free
access during reasonable business hours to all premises where liming
materials are manufactured, sold, or stored, and vehicles wherein
distributed, and are authorized at all times to stop-sale by written order
any and all liming materials that are unregistered, misbranded, fail to meet
the guarantee, or otherwise fail to comply with the provisions of this
subchapter.

2-19-305. Penalty for deficiency from guaranteed analysis.
*CRH152*
03/10/2025 4:44:55 PM CRH152

HB1741
(a) If any liming material offered for sale in this state shall, upon
official analysis, prove deficient from its statement of guarantee to the
extent of five percent (5%) or more, then the manufacturer, importer, or
guarantor of the liming material shall be liable for two (2) times the value
of the actual deficiency as shown by the official analysis.
(b)(1) Penalties assessed under this section, except those exceeding
the actual value of the shortages found, shall be paid to the consumer of the
lot of deficient liming material within thirty (30) days after the date of
notice from the State Plant Board Department of Agriculture to the
manufacturer, importer, or guarantor, receipts to be taken and promptly
forwarded to the board department.
(2) The value of the deficiencies exceeding the actual shortages
and the actual value of the shortages when the consumer cannot be found shall
be paid to the board department within forty-five (45) days after the date of
notice from the board department to the manufacturer, importer, or guarantor
and shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund of the State Treasury.
(c) The board State Plant Board is authorized to cancel the present
registration or to refuse to register for the next season any liming
materials offered for sale or distribution by any manufacturer, importer, or
guarantor who fails or refuses to comply with this section.

2-19-306. Registration.
(a) Before any liming material is sold or offered for sale or
distribution in this state, the manufacturer, importer, or other guarantor,
which is a person or firm that places or mixes liming materials of more than
one (1) manufacturer in a stockpile, shall register each liming material with
the State Plant Board Department of Agriculture.
(b)(1) The registration shall contain the statement referred to in §
2-19-303 or the rules provided for therein.
(2) and be accompanied by a fee A sum of fifteen dollars
($15.00) for each liming material shall be paid with the registration.
(c) Registrations shall expire June 30 of each year.

2-19-307. Quarterly tonnage reports.
(a)(1)(A)(i) All manufacturers, importers, and other guarantors who
are registered under § 2-19-306(a) shall forward to the State Plant Board
03/10/2025 4:44:55 PM CRH152

HB1741
Department of Agriculture each quarter a report on forms prescribed by the
State Plant Board department, not later than thirty (30) days after the end
of each quarter.
(ii) Quarters shall end September 30, December 31,
March 31, and June 30 of each year.
(B)(i) The report shall include a sworn statement of the
total tonnage of all liming materials distributed in this state.
(ii) and shall be accompanied by the The sum of
thirty cents (30¢) per ton or fractional ton shall be paid.
(iii) Upon receipt of the report under subdivision
(a)(1)(A)(i) of this section, the department shall invoice the responsible
party for payment of the sum.
(2)(A) A fee sum of thirty cents (30¢) will accompany shall be
paid for each quarterly report of tonnage which amounts to less than one (1)
ton.
(B) Upon receipt of the report under subdivision (a)(2)(A)
of this section, the department shall invoice the responsible party for
payment.
(3)(A) When sales or distributions of liming materials are
between registrants, the registrant who sells or distributes to a person or
firm who is not a registrant shall be responsible for payment of the
inspection fee unless the payment is made by the registrant initiating the
transaction.
(B) Invoices of transactions between registrants shall be
marked “inspection fee paid” or “inspection fee not paid”; otherwise, the
registrant initiating the transaction shall be responsible for payment of the
inspection fee.
(C) The State Plant Board department shall issue receipts
for the amounts received and shall deposit the sums received as follows:
(i) Twenty cents (20¢) of the thirty-cent fee sum
per ton or fractional ton inspected shall be deposited with the Treasurer of
State as special revenues. It shall be credited to the State Plant Board
Plant Board Fund to be used for its maintenance, operation, support, and
improvement; and
(ii)(a) Ten cents (10¢) of the thirty-cent fee sum
per ton or fractional ton inspected shall be remitted to the Board of
03/10/2025 4:44:55 PM CRH152

HB1741
Trustees of the University of Arkansas. This amount shall be credited to a
fund to be known as the “University of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture,
Soil Testing and Research Fund” to be maintained in accounts in one (1) or
more financial institutions in the State of Arkansas. This amount shall be
expended exclusively for soil testing service and soil fertility research and
extension by the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas under
appropriations made by the General Assembly. It shall be expended in support
of one (1) or more soil testing laboratories and soil fertility research
activities at the main experiment stations, branch experiment stations, or
subbranch experiment stations, as determined and designated by the Vice
President for Agriculture of the University of Arkansas.
(b)(1) The Board of Trustees of the University
of Arkansas shall provide for the investment of any funds in the University
of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and Research Fund that are
not needed for current operations of the soil testing laboratories and soil
fertility service and research and extension activities and shall credit the
interest earned on the investment to the credit of the University of
Arkansas, Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and Research Fund.
(2) The investment shall be of the type
and nature authorized for the investment of average daily State Treasury
balances by the State Board of Finance.
(b)(1) The State Plant Board department or its agents shall have the
right at any time to inspect or audit the books of any manufacturer and
manipulator or their agents to determine the correctness of the monthly
reports required under this section.
(2) Refusal to allow this inspection or audit shall be deemed a
violation of this subchapter, and the violator shall be subject to the
penalties provided in it.
(3) For a late report or for failure to report the entire amount
sold, the sum owed for tonnage fee on the late report or unreported amount
shall be doubled, and penalties shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund;
otherwise, registrations may be cancelled by the State Plant Board.




03/10/2025 4:44:55 PM CRH152